Utah statutes.
31A-17-604.   Regulatory action level event.
(1)  "Regulatory action level event" means with respect to any insurer or
health organization, any of the following events:
(a)  the filing of an RBC report by the insurer or health organization that
indicates that the insurer's or health organization's total adjusted capital
is greater than or equal to its authorized control level RBC but less than its
regulatory action level RBC;
(b)  the notification by the commissioner to an insurer or health organization
of an adjusted RBC report that indicates the event in Subsection (1)(a),
provided the insurer or health organization does not challenge the adjusted
RBC report under Section 31A-17-607;
(c)  if, pursuant to Section 31A-17-607, the insurer or health organization
challenges an adjusted RBC report that indicates the event in Subsection
(1)(a), the notification by the commissioner to the insurer or health
organization that after a hearing the commissioner rejects the insurer's or
health organization's challenge;
(d)  the failure of the insurer or health organization to file an RBC report
by March 1, unless the insurer or health organization has:
(i)  provided an explanation for the failure that is satisfactory to the
commissioner; and
(ii)  cured the failure within ten days after March 1;
(e)  the failure of the insurer or health organization to submit an RBC plan
to the commissioner within the time period set forth in Subsection
31A-17-603(3);
(f)  notification by the commissioner to the insurer or health organization
that:
(i)  the RBC plan or revised RBC plan submitted by the insurer or health
organization is unsatisfactory; and
(ii)  the notification constitutes a regulatory action level event with
respect to the insurer or health organization, provided the insurer has not
challenged the determination under Section 31A-17-607;
(g)  if, pursuant to Section 31A-17-607, the insurer or health organization
challenges a determination by the commissioner under Subsection (1)(f), the
notification by the commissioner to the insurer or health organization that
after a hearing the commissioner rejects the challenge; or
(h)  notification by the commissioner to the insurer or health organization
that the insurer or health organization has failed to adhere to its RBC plan
or revised RBC plan, but only if:
(i)  the failure has a substantial adverse effect on the ability of the
insurer or health organization to eliminate the company action level event in
accordance with its RBC plan or revised RBC plan; and
(ii)  the commissioner has so stated in the notification, provided the insurer
or health organization has not challenged the determination under Section
31A-17-607; or
(iii)  if, pursuant to Section 31A-17-607, the insurer or health organization
challenges a determination by the commissioner under Subsection (1)(h), the
notification by the commissioner to the insurer or health organization that
after a hearing the commissioner rejects the challenge.
(2)  In the event of a regulatory action level event the commissioner shall:
(a)  require the insurer or health organization to prepare and submit an RBC
plan or, if applicable, a revised RBC plan;
(b)  perform any examination or analysis the commissioner considers necessary
of the assets, liabilities, and operations of the insurer or health
organization, including a review of its RBC plan or revised RBC plan; and
(c)  subsequent to the examination or analysis, issue a corrective order
specifying the corrective action the commissioner determines is required.
(3)  In determining a corrective action, the commissioner may take into
account such factors the commissioner considers relevant with respect to the
insurer or health organization based upon the commissioner's examination or
analysis of the assets, liabilities, and operations of the insurer or health
organization, including the results of any sensitivity tests undertaken
pursuant to the RBC instructions.  The RBC plan or revised RBC plan shall be
submitted:
(a)  within 45 days after the occurrence of the regulatory action level event;
(b)  if the insurer or health organization challenges an adjusted RBC report
pursuant to Section 31A-17-607 and the commissioner determines the challenge
is not frivolous, within 45 days after the notification to the insurer or
health organization that after a hearing the commissioner rejects the
insurer's or health organization's challenge; or
(c)  if the insurer or health organization challenges a revised RBC plan
pursuant to Section 31A-17-607 and the commissioner determines the challenge
is not frivolous, within 45 days after the notification to the insurer or
health organization that after a hearing the commissioner rejects the
insurer's or health organization's challenge.
